Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.430

Collaboration with children's system of care demonstration sites.

It is the expectation of the legislature that local school districts shall collaborate with each children's system of care demonstration site established under RCW 74.55.010.

[ 2002 c 309 s 6.]